Missouri, session 2026, HB1958.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 196, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 196.1420, to read as follows:
196.1420. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as
the "Missouri Chemical Label Integrity Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "CAS number", a Chemical Abstract Service Registry number;
(2) "Food", the same meaning given to the term in section 196.010;
(3) "Unsafe chemical":
(a) Acrylamide, CAS number 79-06-1;
(b) Arsenic, CAS number 7440-38-2;
(c) Bisphenol A (BPA), CAS number 80-05-7;
(d) Blue 1, CAS number 2475-45-8;
(e) Cadmium, CAS number 7440-43-9;
(f) Di(2-ethylhexyl)phthalate (DEHP), CAS number 117-81-7;
(g) Lead, CAS number 7439-92-1;
(h) Mercury, CAS number 7439-97-6;
(i) Red 40, CAS number 25956-17-6;
(j) Yellow 5, CAS number 1934-21-0; or
(k) Yellow 6, CAS number 2783-94-0.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1958 2
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any business that sells or
manufactures a food product containing an unsafe chemical shall ensure that the food
product contains a warning label that meets the requirements of this section before the
food product reaches the ultimate consumer.
4. The warning label required under this section shall include:
(1) The name of each unsafe chemical contained in the food product and a
statement that the food product contains such unsafe chemical; and
(2) The possible health effects of ingesting each such unsafe chemical, including
the following information where applicable:
(a) A statement that the unsafe chemical may cause cancer or is known to cause
cancer;
(b) A statement that the unsafe chemical may cause birth defects or is known to
cause birth defects; and
(c) A statement that the unsafe chemical may cause reproductive harm or is
known to cause reproductive harm.
✔